apertium-es-gl.gl.dix
<pardef n="o/ír__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>iriamos</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iriámo</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iriámos</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iriámo</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iría</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iría</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__habería"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iriades</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iriáde</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iriádes</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irías</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iría</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irías</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irían</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irían</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iría</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iría</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iremos</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irémo</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irémos</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irémo</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irei</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irei</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iréi</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iredes</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iréde</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irédes</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irás</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ira</l>       <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iras</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irás</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irán</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iran</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irán</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irá</l>       <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ira</l>       <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irá</l>       <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>írmos</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>írmo</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>írmos</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>írmo</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ír</l>        <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>í</l>         <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ír</l>        <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>írdes</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>írde</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>írdes</l>     <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>íres</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>íre</l>       <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>íres</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>íren</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>íren</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ír</l>        <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>í</l>         <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ír</l>        <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ír</l>        <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índo</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índo</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índomos</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índomo</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índomos</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índomo</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índodes</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índode</l>    <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>índodes</l>   <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ímos</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ímo</l>       <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ímos</l>      <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ímo</l>       <r>ír<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>

<e lm="desoír"><i>deso</i><par n="o/ír__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oír"><i>o</i><par n="o/ír__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="saír"><i>sa</i><par n="o/ír__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobresaír"><i>sobresa</i><par n="o/ír__vblex"/></e>
